Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2461
Adulterated drug, defined.

Adulterated drug means an article (1) if, when a drug is sold under or by the name recognized in The United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary, it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity as determined by the test laid down in The United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary official at the time of investigation, except that no drug defined in The United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary shall be deemed to be adulterated under this subdivision if the standard of strength or purity is plainly stated upon the bottle, box, or other container thereof, although the standard may differ from that determined by the test laid down in The United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary, or (2) if its strength or purity falls below the professed standard of quality under which it is sold.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 9, p. 560;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-928;

R.S.1943, § 81-620;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-2401;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 5.